Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.380

Retention of existing personnel.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall offer to employ every person who on the date such corporation acquires a metropolitan facility is employed in the operation of such facility by a component city or county or by a special district.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.380. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 38.]

NOTES:

Assumption of labor contracts upon acquisition of transportation system: RCW 35.58.265.